North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
the first time, calculated on the basis of his total creditable service represented by the sum of his creditable service at the time of his first retirement and his creditable service after he was restored to
service. Provided, however, any election of an optional allowance cannot be changed unless the member subsequently completes three years of membership service after being restored to service.

As a condition to the receipt of the disability retirement allowance provided for in G.S. 135-5(d), (d1), (d2) and (d3) each member retired on a disability retirement allowance shall, on or before April 15 of each calendar year, provide the Board of Trustees
with a statement of his or her income received as compensation for services, including fees, commissions or similar items, and income received from business, for the previous calendar year. Such statement shall be filed
on a form as required by the Board of Trustees. The benefit payable to a beneficiary who does not or refuses to provide the information requested within 60 days after such request shall not be paid a benefit until the information
so requested is provided, and should such refusal or failure to provide such information continue for 240 days after such request, the right of a beneficiary to a benefit under the Article may be terminated.The Director
of the State Retirement System shall contact any State or federal agency which can provide information to substantiate the statement required to be submitted by this subdivision and may enter into agreements for the exchange
of information.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Article to the contrary, a beneficiary who was a beneficiary retired on a disability retirement with the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System at the time of the transfer of law-enforcement officers employed
by a participating employer and beneficiaries last employed by a participating employer to this Retirement System and who also was a contributing member of this Retirement System at that time, shall continue to be paid
his retirement allowance without restriction and may continue as a member of this Retirement System with all the rights and privileges appendant to membership. Any beneficiary who retired on a disability retirement allowance
as an employee of any participating employer under the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System and becomes employed as an employee other than as a law-enforcement officer by an employer participating in the Retirement
System after the aforementioned transfer shall continue to be paid his retirement allowance without restriction and may continue as a member of this Retirement System with all the rights and privileges appendant to membership
until January 1, 1989, at which time his retirement allowance shall cease and his subsequent retirement shall be determined in accordance with the preceding subdivision (3a) of this subsection. Any beneficiary as hereinbefore
described who becomes employed as a law-enforcement officer by an employer participating in the Retirement System shall cease to be a beneficiary and shall immediately commence membership and his subsequent retirement shall
be determined in accordance with subdivision (3a) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, a beneficiary in receipt of a disability retirement allowance until the earliest date on which he would have qualified for an unreduced service retirement allowance shall thereafter (i) not be subject
to further reexaminations as to disability, (ii) not be subject to any reduction in allowance on account of being engaged in a gainful occupation other than with an employer participating in the Retirement System, and (iii)
be considered a beneficiary in receipt of a service retirement allowance. Provided, however, a beneficiary in receipt of a disability retirement allowance whose allowance is reduced on account of reexamination as to disability
or to ability to engage in a gainful occupation prior to the date on which he would have qualified for an unreduced service retirement allowance shall have only the right to elect to convert to an early or service retirement
allowance as permitted under subdivision (1) above.

Return of Accumulated Contributions. — Should a member cease to be a teacher or State employee except by death or retirement under the provisions of this Chapter, the member shall upon submission of an application be paid, not earlier than 60 days from
the date of termination of service, the member’s contributions, and the accumulated regular interest thereon, provided that the member has not in the meantime returned to service. Upon payment of such sum his or her membership
in the System shall cease and, if he or she thereafter again becomes a member, no credit shall be allowed for any service previously rendered except as provided in

G.S. 135-4

, and such payment shall be in full and complete discharge of any rights in or to any benefits otherwise payable hereunder. Upon receipt of proof satisfactory to the Board of Trustees of the death, prior to retirement,
of a member or former member there shall be paid to such person or persons as the member or former member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly
acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time of the member’s death, otherwise to the member’s legal representatives, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions at
the time of the member’s death, unless the beneficiary elects to receive the alternate benefit under the provisions of (m) below. An extension service employee who made contributions to the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement
System and the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System as a result of dual employment may not be paid his or her accumulated contributions unless the extension service employee is eligible to be paid his or her accumulated
contributions in both systems for the same period of service.Pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 135-56.2

, a member who is also a member of the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System may irrevocably elect to transfer any accumulated contributions to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System or to the Supplemental
Retirement Income Plan and forfeit any rights in or to any benefits otherwise payable hereunder.A member who is a participant or beneficiary of the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina as is provided in Article 6 of this Chapter
shall not be paid a return of accumulated contributions, notwithstanding the member’s status as an employee or teacher. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a member who is a beneficiary of the Disability
Income Plan of North Carolina as provided in Article 6 of this Chapter and who is receiving disability benefits under the transition provisions as provided in

G.S. 135-112

, shall not be prohibited from receiving a return of accumulated contributions as provided in this subsection.

(f1) Expired.

(See Editor’s note) Election of Optional Allowance. — With the provision that until the first payment on account of any benefit becomes normally due, or the member’s first retirement check has been cashed, any member may elect to receive his or her benefits
in a retirement allowance payable throughout life, or the member may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent of such retirement allowance, including any special retirement allowance, in a reduced allowance payable throughout
life under the provisions of one of the options set forth below. The election of Option 2, 3, or 6 or nomination of the person thereunder shall be revoked if such person nominated dies prior to the date the first payment becomes
normally due or until the member’s first retirement check has been cashed. Such election may be revoked by the member prior to the date the first payment becomes normally due or until the member’s first retirement check has been
cashed. Provided, however, in the event a member has elected Option 2, 3, or 5 and nominated his or her spouse to receive a retirement allowance upon the member’s death, and the spouse predeceases the member after the first payment
becomes normally due or the first retirement check has been cashed, if the member remarries he or she may request to nominate a new spouse to receive the retirement allowance under the previously elected option, within 90 days
of the remarriage, and may nominate a new spouse to receive the retirement allowance under the previously elected option by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees within 120 days of the remarriage.
The new nomination shall be effective on the first day of the month in which it is made and shall provide for a retirement allowance computed to be the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance in effect immediately prior
to the effective date of the new nomination. Any member having elected Option 2, 3, 5, or 6 and nominated his or her spouse to receive a retirement allowance upon the member’s death may, after divorce from his or her spouse, revoke
the nomination and elect a new option, effective on the first day of the month in which the new option is elected, providing for a retirement allowance computed to be the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance in effect
immediately prior to the effective date of the new option. Except as provided in this section, the member may not change the member’s retirement benefit option or the member’s designated beneficiary for survivor benefits, if any,
after the member has cashed the first retirement check or after the 25th day of the month following the month in which the first check is mailed, whichever comes first.

Option 1

(a) In the Case of a Member Who Retires prior to July 1, 1963. — If he dies before he has received in annuity payments the present value of his annuity as it was at the time of his retirement, the balance shall be paid to his legal representatives or
to such person as he shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees.

(b) In the Case of a Member Who Retires on or after July 1, 1963, but prior to July 1, 1993. — If he dies within 10 years from his retirement date, an amount equal to his accumulated contributions at retirement, less 1/120 thereof for each month for which
he has received a retirement allowance payment, shall be paid to his legal representatives or to such person as he shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees; orOption 2. Upon
his death his reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person as he shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees at the time of
his retirement, provided that if the person selected is other than his spouse the reduced retirement allowance payable to the member shall not be less than one half of the retirement allowance without optional modification
which would otherwise be payable to him; orOption 3. Upon his death, one half of his reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to such person as he shall nominate by written designation
duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees at the time of his retirement; orOption 4. Adjustment of Retirement Allowance for Social Security Benefits. — Until the first payment on account of any benefit becomes
normally due, any member may elect to convert his benefit otherwise payable on his account after retirement into a retirement allowance of equivalent actuarial value of such amount that with his benefit under Title II of the
Federal Social Security Act, he will receive, so far as possible, approximately the same amount per year before and after the earliest age at which he becomes eligible, effective as of the first of the month following the month
of initial entitlement, upon application therefor, to receive a social security benefit.Option 5. For Members Retiring Prior to July 1, 1993. — The member may elect to receive a reduced retirement allowance under the conditions
of Option 2 or Option 3, as provided for above, with the modification that if both he and the person nominated die within 10 years from his retirement date, an amount equal to his accumulated contributions at retirement, less
1/120 thereof for each month for which a retirement allowance has been paid, shall be paid to his legal representatives or to such person as he shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board
of Trustees.Option 6. A member may elect either Option 2 or Option 3 with the added provision that in the event the designated beneficiary predeceases the member, the retirement allowance payable to the member after the designated
beneficiary’s death shall be equal to the retirement allowance which would have been payable had the member not elected the option.Upon the death of a member after the effective date of a retirement for which the member has
been approved and following receipt by the Board of Trustees of an election of benefits (Form 6-E or Form 7-E) but prior to the cashing of the first benefit check, the retirement benefit shall be payable as provided by the
member’s election of benefits under this subsection.Upon the death of a member after the effective date of a retirement for which the member has been approved but prior to the receipt by the Board of Trustees of an election
of benefits (Form 6-E or Form 7-E), properly acknowledged and filed by the member, the member’s designated beneficiary for a return of accumulated contributions may elect to receive the benefit, if only one beneficiary is eligible
to receive the return of accumulated contributions. If more than one beneficiary is eligible to receive the return of accumulated contributions, or if no beneficiary has been designated, the administrator or executor of the
member’s estate will select an option and name the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(g1) In the event of the death of a retired member while in receipt of a retirement allowance under the provisions of this Article, there shall be paid to such person or persons as the retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved
by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time of the retiree’s death, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representatives,
a death benefit equal to the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions of the retiree at the date of retirement over the total of the retirement allowances paid prior to the death of the retiree. In the event that a
retiree is receiving a Special Retirement Allowance under subsection (m1) of this section, there shall be paid to such person or persons as the retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the
Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time of the retiree’s death, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representatives,
an additional death benefit equal to the excess, if any, of the employee’s voluntary contributions that were transferred from the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina or the North Carolina Public Employee Deferred
Compensation Plan to this Retirement System over the total of the Special Retirement Allowances paid prior to the death of the retiree. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “accumulated contributions” excludes any amount
transferred under subsection (m2) of this section.In the event that a retirement allowance becomes payable to the designated survivor of a retired member under the provisions above and such retirement allowance to the survivor
shall terminate upon the death of the survivor before the total of the retirement allowances paid to the retiree and the designated survivor combined equals the amount of the accumulated contributions of the retiree at the
date of retirement, the excess, if any, of such accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement allowances paid to the retiree and the survivor combined shall be paid in a lump sum to such person or persons as the
retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the
time such payment falls due, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representative. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “accumulated contributions” includes amounts of employee voluntary contributions that were transferred from
the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina to this Retirement System at retirement by eligible law enforcement officers.In the event that a retirement allowance becomes payable to the principal beneficiary designated
to receive a return of accumulated contributions pursuant to subsection (m) of this section and that beneficiary dies before the total of the retirement allowances paid equals the amount of the accumulated contributions of
the member at the date of the member’s death, the excess of those accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement allowances paid to the beneficiary shall be paid in a lump sum to the person or persons the member
has designated as the contingent beneficiary for return of accumulated contributions, if the person or persons are living at the time the payment falls due, otherwise to the principal beneficiary’s legal representative. For
purposes of this paragraph, the term “accumulated contributions” includes amounts of employee voluntary contributions that were transferred from the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina to this Retirement System
at retirement by eligible law enforcement officers.In the event a retiree purchases creditable service as provided in

G.S. 135-4

, there shall be paid to such person or persons as the retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed
with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time of the retiree’s death, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representatives, an additional death benefit equal to the excess, if any, of the cost of
the creditable service purchased less the administrative fee, if any, over the total of the increase in the retirement allowance attributable to the additional creditable service, paid from the month following the month in
which payment was received to the death of the retiree.In the event that a retirement allowance becomes payable to the designated survivor of a retired member under the provisions above and such retirement allowance to the
survivor shall terminate upon the death of the survivor before the total of the increase in the retirement allowance attributable to the additional creditable service paid to the retiree and the designated survivor combined
equals the cost of the creditable service purchased less the administrative fee, the excess, if any, shall be paid in a lump sum to such person or persons as the retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form
approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time such payment falls due, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representative.In
the event that a retiree dies without having designated a beneficiary to receive a benefit under the provisions of this subsection, any such benefit that becomes payable shall be paid to the member’s estate.

Computation of Benefits Payable Prior or Subsequent to July 1, 1947. — Prior to July 1, 1947, all benefits payable as of February 22, 1945, shall be computed on the basis of the provisions of Chapter 135 as they existed at the time of the retirement
of such beneficiaries. On and after July 1, 1947, all benefits payable to, or on account of, such beneficiaries shall be adjusted to take into account, under such rule as the Board of Trustees may adopt, the provisions of this
Article as if they had been in effect at the date of retirement, and no further contributions on account of such adjustment shall be required of such beneficiaries. The Board of Trustees may authorize such transfers of reserve
between the funds of the Retirement System as may be required by the provisions of this subsection.

Restoration to Service of Certain Former Members. — If a former member who ceased to be a member prior to July 1, 1949, for any reason other than retirement, again becomes a member and prior to July 1, 1951, redeposits in the annuity savings fund by
a single payment the amount, if any, he previously withdrew therefrom, he shall, anything in this Chapter to the contrary, be entitled to any membership service credits he had when his membership ceased, and any prior service certificate
which became void at the time his membership ceased shall be restored to full force and effect: Provided, that, for the purpose of computing the amount of any retirement allowance which may become payable to or on account of such
member under the Retirement System, any amount redeposited as provided herein shall be deemed to represent contributions made by the member after July 1, 1947.

Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, effective July 1, 1959, the following provisions shall apply with respect to any retirement allowance payments due after such date to any retired member who was retired prior to July 1, 1959, on a service
or disability retirement allowance:

If such retired member has not made an election of an optional allowance in accordance with G.S. 135-5(g), the monthly retirement allowance payable to him from and after July 1, 1959, shall be equal to the allowance previously payable, increased by fifteen
percent (15%) thereof, or by fifteen dollars ($15.00), whichever is the lesser; provided that, if such member had rendered not less than 20 years of creditable service, the retirement allowance payable to him from and after
July 1, 1959, shall be not less than seventy dollars ($70.00) per month.

If such retired member has made an effective election of an optional allowance, the allowance payable to him from and after July 1, 1959, shall be equal to the allowance previously payable under such election plus an increase which shall be computed in
accordance with (1) above as if he had not made such an election; provided that such increase shall be payable only during the retired member’s remaining life and no portion of such increase shall become payable to the
beneficiary designated under the election.

Increase in Benefits to Those Persons Who Were in Receipt of Benefits prior to July 1, 1967. —

From and after July 1, 1967, the monthly benefits to or on account of persons who commenced receiving benefits from the System prior to July 1, 1967, shall be increased by a percentage thereof. Such percentage shall be determined in accordance with the
following schedule:

Click to viewThe minimum increase pursuant to this subsection (k) shall be ten dollars ($10.00) per month; provided that, if an optional benefit has been elected, said minimum shall be reduced actuarially as determined by the Board and shall be applicable
to the retired member, if surviving, otherwise to his designated beneficiary under the option elected.

Death Benefit Plan. — There is hereby created a Group Life Insurance Plan (hereinafter called the “Plan”) which is established as an employee welfare benefit plan that is separate and apart from the Retirement System and under which the members of the
Retirement System shall participate and be eligible for group life insurance benefits. The Plan shall be part of the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Benefit Trust, as established under

G.S. 135-7

(g). All receipts, transfers, appropriations, contributions, investment earnings, and other income belonging to the Plan shall be deposited in the Benefit Trust. All benefits and expenses against the Plan shall be
disbursed from the Benefit Trust. Employer and non-employer contributions to the Benefit Trust and earnings on those contributions are irrevocable. The assets of the Benefit Trust are dedicated to providing benefits to participants,
surviving spouses, and the members’ estates in accordance with the Plan’s benefit terms. The assets of the Benefit Trust are not subject to the claims of creditors of the employees and non-employees making contributions to the
Benefit Trust, are not subject to the claims of any creditors of the Benefit Trust’s trustees and administrators, and are not subject to the claims of creditors of members and beneficiaries. Benefit Trust assets may be used for
reasonable expenses to administer benefits provided by the Fund as approved by the Board of Trustees.Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees in their capacity as trustees under the Group Life Insurance Plan,
of the death, in service, of a member who had completed at least one full calendar year of membership in the Retirement System, there shall be paid to such person as the member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a
form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person is living at the time of the member’s death, otherwise to the member’s legal representatives,
a death benefit. Such death benefit shall be equal to the greater of:

The compensation on which contributions were made by the member during the calendar year preceding the year in which his death occurs, or

The greatest compensation on which contributions were made by the member during a 12-month period of service within the 24-month period of service ending on the last day of the month preceding the month in which his last day of actual service occurs;

, (4) Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1049, s. 2.subject to a minimum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and to a maximum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Such death benefit shall be payable apart and separate from
the payment of the member’s accumulated contributions under the System on his death pursuant to the provisions of subsection (f) of this section. For the purpose of the Plan, a member shall be deemed to be in service at
the date of his death if his death occurs within 180 days from the last day of his actual service.The death benefit provided in this subsection (l) shall not be payable, notwithstanding the member’s compliance with all
the conditions set forth in the preceding paragraph, if his death occurs

(1) After December 31, 1968 and after he has attained age 70; or

(2) After December 31, 1969 and after he has attained age 69; or

(3) After December 31, 1970 and after he has attained age 68; or

After December 31, 1971 and after he has attained age 67; or

After December 31, 1972 and after he has attained age 66; or

After December 31, 1973 and after he has attained age 65; or

After December 31, 1978, but before January 1, 1987, and after he has attained age 70.Notwithstanding the above provisions, the death benefit shall be payable on account of the death of any member who died or dies on or after January 1, 1974, but before
January 1, 1979, after attaining age 65, if he or she had not yet attained age 65, if he or she had not yet attained age 66, was at the time of death completing the work year for those individuals under specific contract,
or during the fiscal year for those individuals not under specific contract, in which he or she attained 65, and otherwise met all conditions for payment of the death benefit.Notwithstanding the above provisions, the Board
of Trustees may and is specifically authorized to provide the death benefit according to the terms and conditions otherwise appearing in this Plan in the form of group life insurance, either (i) by purchasing a contract
or contracts of group life insurance with any life insurance company or companies licensed and authorized to transact business in this State for the purpose of insuring the lives of members in service, or (ii) by establishing
a separate trust fund qualified under Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, for such purpose. To that end the Board of Trustees is authorized, empowered and directed to investigate the desirability
of utilizing group life insurance by either of the foregoing methods for the purpose of providing the death benefit. If a separate trust fund is established, it shall be operated in accordance with rules and regulations
adopted by the Board of Trustees and all investment earnings on the trust fund shall be credited to such fund.In administration of the death benefit the following shall apply:

(1) For the purpose of determining eligibility only, in this subsection “calendar year” shall mean any period of 12 consecutive months or, if less, the period covered by an annual contract of employment. For all other purposes in this subsection “calendar
year” shall mean the 12 months beginning January 1 and ending December 31.

(2) Last day of actual service shall be:

When employment has been terminated, the last day the member actually worked.

When employment has not been terminated, the date on which an absent member’s sick and annual leave expire, unless he is on approved leave of absence and is in service under the provisions of

G.S. 135-4(h)

.

When a participant’s employment is interrupted by reason of service in the Uniformed Services, as that term is defined in section 4303(16) of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, Public Law 103-353, and the participant does not
return immediately after that service to employment with a covered employer in this System, the date on which the participant was first eligible to be separated or released from his or her involuntary military service.

(3) For a period when a member is on leave of absence, his status with respect to the death benefit will be determined by the provisions of

G.S. 135-4(h)

.

(4) A member on leave of absence from his position as a teacher or State employee for the purpose of serving as a member or officer of the General Assembly shall be deemed to be in service during sessions of the General Assembly and thereby covered by
the provisions of the death benefit. The amount of the death benefit for such member shall be the equivalent of the salary to which the member would have been entitled as a teacher or State employee during the
12-month period immediately prior to the month in which death occurred, not to be less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) nor to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).The provisions of the Retirement
System pertaining to Administration,

G.S. 135-6

, and management of funds,

G.S. 135-7

, are hereby made applicable to the Plan.A member who is a beneficiary of the Disability Income Plan provided for in Article 6 of this Chapter, or a member who is in receipt of Workers’ Compensation
during the period for which he or she would have otherwise been eligible to receive short-term benefits or extended short-term benefits as provided in

G.S. 135-105

and dies on or after 181 days from the last day of his or her actual service but prior to the date the benefits as provided in

G.S. 135-105

would have ended, shall be eligible for group life insurance benefits as provided in this subsection, notwithstanding that the member is no longer an employee or teacher or that the member’s
death occurs after the eligibility period after active service. The basis of the death benefit payable hereunder shall be the higher of the death benefit computed as above or a death benefit based on compensation
used in computing the benefit payable under G.S. 135-105 and

G.S. 135-106

, as may be adjusted for percentage post-disability increases, all subject to the maximum dollar limitation as provided above. A member in receipt of benefits from the Disability Income Plan
under the provisions of

G.S. 135-112

whose right to a benefit accrued under the former Disability Salary Continuation Plan shall not be covered under the provisions of this paragraph.Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the
Board of Trustees in its capacity under this subsection, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System on or after July 1, 1988, but before January 1, 1999, there shall be paid a death benefit to
the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make,
and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted
by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death
benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon the completion of twenty-four months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion
of twenty-four months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired
member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees in its capacity under this subsection,
of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System on or after January 1, 1999, but before July 1, 2004, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member or to
the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required
contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund
administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of six thousand
dollars ($6,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased
retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by
the Board of Trustees.Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees in its capacity under this subsection, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System on or after July 1, 2004, but
before July 1, 2007, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided
the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis, through
retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit
shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of nine thousand dollars ($9,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months
of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions
required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees in its capacity under this subsection, of the death of a retired
member of the Retirement System on or after July 1, 2007, but before January 1, 2015, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s
legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined
by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board
of Trustees Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under
this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived
by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of
Trustees in its capacity under this subsection, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System on or after January 1, 2015, there shall be paid a death benefit to the person or persons designated
by the member or, if the member has not designated a beneficiary, to the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member or, if not survived by a designated beneficiary or spouse, to the deceased retired member’s
legal representative; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of the member’s death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees
on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund, the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’
Benefit Trust, administered by the Board of Trustees Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. Employer and non-employer contributions to the Benefit Trust and earnings on those contributions are irrevocable. The
assets of the Benefit Trust are dedicated to providing benefits to participants, surviving spouses, and the members’ estates in accordance with the Plan’s benefit terms. The assets of the Benefit Trust are not
subject to the claims of creditors of the employees and non-employees making contributions to the Benefit Trust, are not subject to the claims of any creditors of the Benefit Trust’s trustees and administrators,
and are not subject to the claims of creditors of members and beneficiaries. Benefit Trust assets may be used for reasonable expenses to administer benefits provided by the Fund as approved by the Board of Trustees.
This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the